apertium-tg-fa.tg.dix
    <pardef n="рус/ӣ__adj">
      <e>       <p><l>ӣ</l><r>ӣ<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>и</l><r>ӣ<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p><par n="S__adject_V"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Prefixes -->

    <pardef n="P__на">
      <e>       <p><l>на</l><r>на<s n="neg"/><j/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r/></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs  -->

    <pardef n="/шояд__vbmod">
      <e>       <p><l>шояд</l><r>шояд<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>нашояд</l><r>шояд<s n="vbmod"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/бояд__vbmod">
      <e>       <p><l>бояд</l><r>бояд<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>набояд</l><r>бояд<s n="vbmod"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>боист</l><r>бояд<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <!--<e>       <p><l>мебоист</l><r>бояд<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="кард.ан__vblex"> <!-- Personal suffixes for past tenses -->
      <e>       <p><l>ам</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ӣ</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ем</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ед</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>анд</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__ва_C"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/будан__vbser">
      <e>       <p><l>будан</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>будан</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_C_verb"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>буд</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf2"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>буда</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>буда</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__adject_V"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>будагӣ</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="ppgi"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>будагист</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pic"/></r></p><par n="кард.ан__vblex"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>ҳастам</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ҳасти</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ҳаст</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>аст</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ҳастем</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ҳастед</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ҳастанд</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>нестам</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>нести</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>нест</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>не</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>нестем</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>нестед</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>нестанд</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>мебошам</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>мебоши</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>мебошад</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>мебошим</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>мебошид</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>мебошанд</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="emph"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>бошам</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>боши</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>бошад</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>бошим</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>бошид</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>бошанд</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>набошам</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>набоши</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>набошад</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>набошим</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>набошид</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>набошанд</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>будам</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>будӣ</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>буд</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>будем</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>будед</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>буданд</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>набудам</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>набудӣ</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>набуд</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>набудем</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>набудед</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>набуданд</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>буда</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="S__будан"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>набуда</l><r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="neg"/><s n="perf"/></r></p><par n="S__будан"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="гу/янда__vblex"> <!-- Present participle and verbal adverb -->
      <e>       <p><l>янда</l><r><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>янда</l><r><s n="pprs"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V_verb"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>он</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>он</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="S__nominal_V_verb"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="туркманӣ"><i>туркман</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="русӣ"><i>рус</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="англисӣ"><i>англис</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="испанӣ"><i>испан</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="шӯравӣ"><i>шӯрав</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="тоҷикӣ"><i>тоҷик</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="руминӣ"><i>румин</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="форсӣ"><i>форс</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ӯзбакӣ"><i>ӯзбак</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="қирғизӣ"><i>қирғиз</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="арабӣ"><i>араб</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="амрикоӣ"><i>амрико</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="шахсӣ"><i>шахс</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="генералӣ"><i>генерал</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="асосӣ"><i>асос</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="аслӣ"><i>асл</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="марказӣ"><i>марказ</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="қадимӣ"><i>қадим</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="кашоварзӣ"><i>кашоварз</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="шарқӣ"><i>шарқ</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="шимолӣ"><i>шимол</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ғарбӣ"><i>ғарб</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ҷанубӣ"><i>ҷануб</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="умумӣ"><i>умум</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="болоӣ"><i>боло</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="иқтисодӣ"><i>иқтисод</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="модарӣ"><i>модар</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳавоӣ"><i>ҳаво</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="дохилӣ"><i>дохил</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="фарҳангӣ"><i>фарҳанг</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="хориҷӣ"><i>хориҷ</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="порлумонӣ"><i>порлумон</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="исломӣ"><i>ислом</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="олӣ"><i>ол</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="низомӣ"><i>низом</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="феълӣ"><i>феъл</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="пахтагӣ"><i>пахтаг</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="расмӣ"><i>расм</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="сиёсӣ"><i>сиёс</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ибтидоӣ"><i>ибтидо</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="амниятӣ"><i>амният</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="адабӣ"><i>адаб</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="башарӣ"><i>башар</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ҳукуматӣ"><i>ҳукумат</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="парлумонӣ"><i>парлумон</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ҷорӣ"><i>ҷор</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="давлатӣ"><i>давлат</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="террористӣ"><i>террорист</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="атомӣ"><i>атом</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="демократӣ"><i>демократ</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="конститутсионӣ"><i>конститутсион</i><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="конститутсионӣ" r="LR"><p><l>конститусион</l><r>конститутсион</r></p><par n="рус/ӣ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="бояд"><i/><par n="/бояд__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="шояд"><i/><par n="/шояд__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="будан"><i/><par n="/будан__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="омадан"><p><l>о</l><r>омадан<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="гу/янда__vblex"/></e>
